Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7884.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 39 of the General Laws entitled "PUBLIC UTILITIES AND
CARRIERS" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 3.1
FEDERAL BACKSTOP LANGUAGE
39-3.1-1. Federal backstop language.
If any of the energy or water conservation standards issued or approved for publication by
the office of the United States Secretary of Energy as of January 19, 2025, pursuant to the Energy
Policy and Conservation Act (Parts 430-431 of Title 10 of the Code of Federal Regulations), are
withdrawn, repealed, or otherwise voided, the minimum energy or water efficiency level permitted
for products previously subject to federal energy or water conservation standards in this state shall
be the applicable federal standards as of January 19, 2025, and no such new product may be sold
or offered for sale, lease or rent in this state unless it meets or exceeds such standards. This section
shall not apply to any federal energy or water conservation standard set aside by a court upon the
petition of a person who will be adversely affected, as provided in Section 6306(b) of Title 42 of
the United States Code.
39-3.1-2. Testing, certification, labeling, and enforcement.
(a) The manufacturers of products covered by this chapter shall test samples of their
products in accordance with the test procedures found in the Energy Policy and Conservation Act

(Parts 430-431 of Title 10 of the Code of Federal Regulations) as of January 19, 2025, in accordance
with the federal test procedures as in place on January 19, 2025. Rhode Island energy may adopt
updated test methods by regulation when new versions of test methods become available or when
an alternative test method has been adopted by another state or the federal government.
(b) Manufacturers of new products covered by this chapter shall certify that such products
are in compliance with the provisions of this chapter to the Modernized Appliance Efficiency
Database System, the State Appliance Standards Database, and the Certified Products Directory,
or to an approved third-party database as determined by the Rhode Island office of energy
resources. Such certifications shall be based on test results. The agency may promulgate regulations
further governing the certification of such products and may coordinate with the certification
programs of other states and federal agencies with similar standards.
(c) The Rhode Island office of energy resources (the “agency”) may test products covered
by this chapter. If products so tested are found not to be in compliance with the minimum efficiency
standards, the agency shall:
(1) Charge the manufacturer of such product for the cost of product purchase and testing;
and
(2) Make information available to the attorney general and the public on products found
not to be in compliance with the standards.
(d) The agency may cause periodic inspections to be made of distributors or retailers in
order to determine compliance with the provisions of this chapter. The commission shall investigate
complaints received concerning violations of this chapter.
(e) If the agency finds that any person has committed a violation of any provision of this
chapter, the agency shall issue a warning to such person. Any person who commits a violation after
the issuance of such warning shall be subject to a civil penalty, issued by the agency, of up to one
hundred dollars ($100) for each offense. Any further violations committed by such person after a
second violation shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for
each offense. Each product offered, sold, or distributed in violation of this chapter shall constitute
a separate violation, each violation shall constitute a separate offense, and each day that such
violation occurs shall constitute a separate offense. Penalties assessed under this subsection are in
addition to costs assessed under this section.
(f) If the agency finds repeated violations have occurred, the agency shall report the results
of such violations to the attorney general. The attorney general may institute proceedings to seek
an injunction in state court to enforce the provisions of this chapter.
(g) The agency may adopt such further rules and regulations as necessary to ensure the
LC004496 - Page 2 of 4

proper implementation and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.
39-3.1-3. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter or the applicability thereof to any person or circumstance
is held invalid, the remainder of the chapter and the application of the provision to other persons or
circumstances shall not be affected thereby.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004496
========
LC004496 - Page 3 of 4